Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1304.01
Dead animals; liquefied remains; prohibited acts; violation; penalty.

The liquefied remains of any dead animal shall not be injected below the surface of the ground nor be spread above the surface of the ground in any manner. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1998, LB 1209, § 15;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 54-725;

Laws 1999, LB 6, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 870, § 3.